New Jersey, session 221, S2449.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  There is established the New Jersey COVID-19 Long-Term Health Effects Task Force.  The purpose of the task force shall be to: (1)   study the long-term health effects of COVID-19; (2)   identify symptoms associated with the long-term health effects of COVID-19; (3)   identify medications and other treatments that combat the long-term health effects of COVID-19; (4)   develop methods of educating the public on the long-term health effects of COVID-19; (5)   identify any adverse, long-term health effects caused by COVID-19 vaccines; and (6)   develop strategies for the Department of Health and county and local health departments to help health care professionals treat patients suffering from the long-term health effects of COVID-19. b.    The task force shall consist of nine members as follows: (1)   one member of the public appointed by the Speaker of the General Assembly with experience in COVID-19 and health care; (2)   one member of the public appointed by the Minority Leader of the General Assembly with experience in COVID-19 and health care; (3)   one member of the public appointed by the President of the Senate with experience in COVID-19 and health care; (4)   one member of the public appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate with experience in COVID-19 and health care; (5)   the Commissioner of Health, or a designee, who shall serve ex officio; (6)   two representatives of county or local health departments in New Jersey appointed by the Governor; and (7)   two medical doctors with experience treating patient suffering from long-term health effects of COVID-19 appointed by the Governor. c.     The members of this task force shall be appointed within 30 days after the date of enactment of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before this Legislature as this bill). The task force shall organize as soon as practicable after the appointment of a majority of the task forces members.  The presence of eight members shall constitute a quorum.  The Commissioner of Health shall serve as the chairperson of the task force. d.    The task force shall meet regularly as the task force determines, or at the call of the chairperson or a majority of the task forces membership. e.     All meetings of the task force shall be open to the public.  Agendas, minutes, documents, and testimony from all meetings shall be posted on the Department of Healths Internet website. f.     The members of the task force shall serve without compensation, but the members may be reimbursed for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties, within the limits of funds made available for this purpose. g.    Any vacancies in the membership of this task force shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. h.    The Department of Health shall provide stenographic, clerical, and other administrative assistance, and professional staff as the task force requires to carry out the task forces work.  The task force shall be entitled to call to the task forces assistance and avail itself of the services of the employees of any State, county, or municipal department, board, bureau, commission, or agency as the task force may require and as may be available for the task forces purposes. i.     No later than one year after the task force first organizes, it shall prepare and submit to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, a final report and policy recommendations.  The task force shall expire 30 days after the submission of the task forces report. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire 30 days after the submission of the task forces report pursuant to subsection i. of section 1 of this bill.